data/grammar/fst/suffixes-generated.lexc
++lauqsima+1vv:lauqsima VerbContinuations ;
++lauqsima+1vv:SUPPRlauqsima # ;
++lauqsima+1vv:SUPPRlauqsima VerbContinuations ;
++lauqsimajunniiq+1vv:lauqsimajunniiq # ;
++lauqsimajunniiq+1vv:lauqsimajunniiq VerbContinuations ;
++lauqsimajunniiq+1vv:SUPPRlauqsimajunniiq # ;
++lauqsimajunniiq+1vv:SUPPRlauqsimajunniiq VerbContinuations ;
++ligaa+1vv:ligaa # ;
++ligaa+1vv:ligaa VerbContinuations ;
++ligaa+1vv:SUPPRligaa # ;
++ligaa+1vv:SUPPRligaa VerbContinuations ;
++limaaq+2vv:limaaq # ;
++limaaq+2vv:limaaq VerbContinuations ;
++limaaq+2vv:SUPPRlimaaq # ;
++limaaq+2vv:SUPPRlimaaq VerbContinuations ;
++liq+1vv:liq # ;
++liq+1vv:liq VerbContinuations ;
++liq+1vv:SUPPRliq # ;
++liq+1vv:SUPPRliq VerbContinuations ;
++lirai+1vv:lirai # ;
++lirai+1vv:lirai VerbContinuations ;
++lirai+1vv:SUPPRlirai # ;
++lirai+1vv:SUPPRlirai VerbContinuations ;
++lisaaq+1vv:lisaaq # ;
++lisaaq+1vv:lisaaq VerbContinuations ;
++lisaaq+1vv:SUPPRlisaaq # ;
++lisaaq+1vv:SUPPRlisaaq VerbContinuations ;
++litainnaq+1vv:litainnaq # ;
++litainnaq+1vv:litainnaq VerbContinuations ;
++litainnaq+1vv:SUPPRlitainnaq # ;
++litainnaq+1vv:SUPPRlitainnaq VerbContinuations ;
++llaq+1vv:llaq # ;
++llaq+1vv:llaq VerbContinuations ;
++llaq+1vv:SUPPRllaq # ;
++llaq+1vv:SUPPRllaq VerbContinuations ;
++llarik+1vv:llarik # ;
++llarik+1vv:llarik VerbContinuations ;
++llarik+1vv:larik # ;
++llarik+1vv:larik VerbContinuations ;
++llarik+1vv:SUPPRllarik # ;
++llarik+1vv:SUPPRllarik VerbContinuations ;
++llarik+1vv:SUPPRlarik # ;
++llarik+1vv:SUPPRlarik VerbContinuations ;
++luaq+1vv:luaq # ;
++luaq+1vv:luaq VerbContinuations ;
++luaq+1vv:lluaq # ;
++luaq+1vv:lluaq VerbContinuations ;
++luaq+1vv:SUPPRluaq # ;
++luaq+1vv:SUPPRluaq VerbContinuations ;
++luaq+1vv:SUPPRlluaq # ;
++luaq+1vv:SUPPRlluaq VerbContinuations ;
++luk+3vv:luk # ;
++luk+3vv:luk VerbContinuations ;
++luk+3vv:SUPPRluk # ;
++luk+3vv:SUPPRluk VerbContinuations ;
++ma+1vv:ma # ;
++ma+1vv:ma VerbContinuations ;
++ma+1vv:uma # ;
++ma+1vv:uma VerbContinuations ;
++ma+1vv:SUPPRma # ;
++ma+1vv:SUPPRma VerbContinuations ;
++ma+1vv:SUPPRuma # ;
++ma+1vv:SUPPRuma VerbContinuations ;
++mmarik+2vv:mmarik # ;
++mmarik+2vv:mmarik VerbContinuations ;
++mmarik+2vv:SUPPRmmarik # ;
++mmarik+2vv:SUPPRmmarik VerbContinuations ;
++mmiaq+1vv:mmiaq # ;
++mmiaq+1vv:mmiaq VerbContinuations ;
++mmiaq+1vv:miaq # ;
++mmiaq+1vv:miaq VerbContinuations ;
++mmiaq+1vv:SUPPRmmiaq # ;
++mmiaq+1vv:SUPPRmmiaq VerbContinuations ;
++mmiaq+1vv:SUPPRmiaq # ;
++mmiaq+1vv:SUPPRmiaq VerbContinuations ;
++najaq+1vv:najaq # ;
++najaq+1vv:najaq VerbContinuations ;
++najaq+1vv:gajaq # ;
++najaq+1vv:gajaq VerbContinuations ;
++najaq+1vv:SUPPRgajaq # ;
++najaq+1vv:SUPPRgajaq VerbContinuations ;
++najaq+1vv:SUPPRrajaq # ;
++najaq+1vv:SUPPRrajaq VerbContinuations ;
++nanngit+1vv:nanngit # ;
++nanngit+1vv:nanngit VerbContinuations ;
++nanngit+1vv:NASALnanngit # ;
++nanngit+1vv:NASALnanngit VerbContinuations ;
++naq+1vv:naq # ;
++naq+1vv:naq VerbContinuations ;
++naq+1vv:nak # ;
++naq+1vv:nak VerbContinuations ;
++naq+1vv:NASALnaq # ;
++naq+1vv:NASALnaq VerbContinuations ;
++naq+1vv:NASALnak # ;
++naq+1vv:NASALnak VerbContinuations ;
++nasaaq+1vv:nasaaq # ;
++nasaaq+1vv:nasaaq VerbContinuations ;
++nasaaq+1vv:VOICEnasaaq # ;
++nasaaq+1vv:VOICEnasaaq VerbContinuations ;
++nasugi+1vv:nasugi # ;
++nasugi+1vv:nasugi VerbContinuations ;
++nasugi+1vv:nasugi AfterApKsiRoot ;
++nasugi+1vv:SUPPRgasugi # ;
++nasugi+1vv:SUPPRgasugi VerbContinuations ;
++nasugi+1vv:SUPPRgasugi AfterApKsiRoot ;
++nasugi+1vv:SUPPRrasugi # ;
++nasugi+1vv:SUPPRrasugi VerbContinuations ;
++nasugi+1vv:SUPPRrasugi AfterApKsiRoot ;
++nasuk+1vv:nasuk # ;
++nasuk+1vv:nasuk VerbContinuations ;
++nasuk+1vv:gasuk # ;
++nasuk+1vv:gasuk VerbContinuations ;
++nasuk+1vv:gasuaq # ;
++nasuk+1vv:gasuaq VerbContinuations ;
++nasuk+1vv:nasuaq # ;
++nasuk+1vv:nasuaq VerbContinuations ;
++nasuk+1vv:SUPPRgasuk # ;
++nasuk+1vv:SUPPRgasuk VerbContinuations ;
++nasuk+1vv:SUPPRgasuaq # ;
++nasuk+1vv:SUPPRgasuaq VerbContinuations ;
++nasuk+1vv:SUPPRrasuk # ;
++nasuk+1vv:SUPPRrasuk VerbContinuations ;
++nasuk+1vv:SUPPRrasuaq # ;
++nasuk+1vv:SUPPRrasuaq VerbContinuations ;
++nga+1vv:nga # ;
++nga+1vv:nga VerbContinuations ;
++nga+1vv:SUPPRnga # ;
++nga+1vv:SUPPRnga VerbContinuations ;
++ngaaq+2vv:ngaaq # ;
++ngaaq+2vv:ngaaq VerbContinuations ;
++ngaaq+2vv:NASALngaaq # ;
++ngaaq+2vv:NASALngaaq VerbContinuations ;
++nialauq+1vv:nialauq # ;
++nialauq+1vv:nialauq VerbContinuations ;
++nialauq+1vv:NASALnialauq # ;
++nialauq+1vv:NASALnialauq VerbContinuations ;
++niaq+2vv:niaq # ;
++niaq+2vv:niaq VerbContinuations ;
++niaq+2vv:NASALniaq # ;
++niaq+2vv:NASALniaq VerbContinuations ;
++niaqqau+1vv:niaqqau # ;
++niaqqau+1vv:niaqqau VerbContinuations ;
++niaqqau+1vv:NASALniaqqau # ;
++niaqqau+1vv:NASALniaqqau VerbContinuations ;
++niq+1vv:NASALniq # ;
++niq+1vv:NASALniq VerbContinuations ;
++niraq+1vv:niraq # ;
++niraq+1vv:niraq VerbContinuations ;
++niraq+1vv:niraq AfterApIRoot ;
++niraq+1vv:NASALniraq # ;
++niraq+1vv:NASALniraq VerbContinuations ;
++niraq+1vv:NASALniraq AfterApIRoot ;
++niujaq+1vv:niujaq # ;
++niujaq+1vv:niujaq VerbContinuations ;
++niujaq+1vv:niujaaq # ;
++niujaq+1vv:niujaaq VerbContinuations ;
++niujaq+1vv:SUPPRniujaq # ;
++niujaq+1vv:SUPPRniujaq VerbContinuations ;
++niujaq+1vv:SUPPRniujaaq # ;
++niujaq+1vv:SUPPRniujaaq VerbContinuations ;
++niusau+1vv:niusau # ;
++niusau+1vv:niusau VerbContinuations ;
++niusau+1vv:SUPPRniusau # ;
++niusau+1vv:SUPPRniusau VerbContinuations ;
++nnajuk+2vv:nnajuk # ;
++nnajuk+2vv:nnajuk VerbContinuations ;
++nnajuk+2vv:SUPPRnnajuk # ;
++nnajuk+2vv:SUPPRnnajuk VerbContinuations ;
++nngit+1vv:nngit # ;
++nngit+1vv:nngit VerbContinuations ;
++nngit+1vv:SUPPRnngit # ;
++nngit+1vv:SUPPRnngit VerbContinuations ;
++nnguaq+2vv:nnguaq # ;
++nnguaq+2vv:nnguaq VerbContinuations ;
++nnguaq+2vv:SUPPRnnguaq # ;
++nnguaq+2vv:SUPPRnnguaq VerbContinuations ;
++nnguk+1vv:nnguk # ;
++nnguk+1vv:nnguk VerbContinuations ;
++nnguk+1vv:nnguq # ;
++nnguk+1vv:nnguq VerbContinuations ;
++nnguk+1vv:SUPPRnnguk # ;
++nnguk+1vv:SUPPRnnguk VerbContinuations ;
++nnguk+1vv:SUPPRnnguq # ;
++nnguk+1vv:SUPPRnnguq VerbContinuations ;
++nngusuk+1vv:nngusuk # ;
++nngusuk+1vv:nngusuk VerbContinuations ;
++nngusuk+1vv:SUPPRnngusuk # ;
++nngusuk+1vv:SUPPRnngusuk VerbContinuations ;
++paaq+1vv:paaq # ;
++paaq+1vv:paaq VerbContinuations ;
++paluk+2vv:paluk # ;
++paluk+2vv:paluk VerbContinuations ;
++pasaaq+1vv:pasaaq # ;
++pasaaq+1vv:pasaaq VerbContinuations ;
++pillaq+1vv:pillaq # ;
++pillaq+1vv:pillaq VerbContinuations ;
++pillaq+1vv:pillak # ;
++pillaq+1vv:pillak VerbContinuations ;
++pillaq+1vv:SUPPRpillaq # ;
++pillaq+1vv:SUPPRpillaq VerbContinuations ;
++pillaq+1vv:SUPPRpillak # ;
++pillaq+1vv:SUPPRpillak VerbContinuations ;
++qaminngit+1vv:qaminngit # ;
++qaminngit+1vv:qaminngit VerbContinuations ;
++qaminngit+1vv:SUPPRqaminngit # ;
++qaminngit+1vv:SUPPRqaminngit VerbContinuations ;
++qammaq+2vv:qammaq # ;
++qammaq+2vv:qammaq VerbContinuations ;
++qammaq+2vv:SUPPRqammaq # ;
++qammaq+2vv:SUPPRqammaq VerbContinuations ;
++qatau+1vv:qatau # ;
++qatau+1vv:qatau VerbContinuations ;
++qatau+1vv:SUPPRqatau # ;
++qatau+1vv:SUPPRqatau VerbContinuations ;
++qatauti+1vv:qatauti # ;
++qatauti+1vv:qatauti VerbContinuations ;
++qatauti+1vv:SUPPRqatauti # ;
++qatauti+1vv:SUPPRqatauti VerbContinuations ;
++qattaq+1vv:qattaq # ;
++qattaq+1vv:qattaq VerbContinuations ;
++qattaq+1vv:SUPPRqattaq # ;
++qattaq+1vv:SUPPRqattaq VerbContinuations ;
++qi+1vv:qi # ;
++qi+1vv:qi VerbContinuations ;
++qi+1vv:SUPPRqi # ;
++qi+1vv:SUPPRqi VerbContinuations ;
++qqaaq+1vv:qqaaq # ;
++qqaaq+1vv:qqaaq VerbContinuations ;
++qqaaq+1vv:SUPPRqqaaq # ;
++qqaaq+1vv:SUPPRqqaaq VerbContinuations ;
++qqau+1vv:qqau # ;
++qqau+1vv:qqau VerbContinuations ;
++qqau+1vv:SUPPRqqau # ;
++qqau+1vv:SUPPRqqau VerbContinuations ;
++qqautau+1vv:qqautau # ;
++qqautau+1vv:qqautau VerbContinuations ;
++qqautau+1vv:SUPPRqqautau # ;
++qqautau+1vv:SUPPRqqautau VerbContinuations ;
++qquuq+1vv:qquuq # ;
++qquuq+1vv:qquuq VerbContinuations ;
++qquuq+1vv:SUPPRqquuq # ;
++qquuq+1vv:SUPPRqquuq VerbContinuations ;
++qu+2vv:qu # ;
++qu+2vv:qu VerbContinuations ;
++qu+2vv:qu AfterApJiRoot ;
++qu+2vv:SUPPRqu # ;
++qu+2vv:SUPPRqu VerbContinuations ;
++qu+2vv:SUPPRqu AfterApJiRoot ;
++quuji+1vv:quuji # ;
++quuji+1vv:quuji VerbContinuations ;
++quuji+1vv:SUPPRquuji # ;
++quuji+1vv:SUPPRquuji VerbContinuations ;
++rajaaq+1vv:rajaaq # ;
++rajaaq+1vv:rajaaq VerbContinuations ;
++rajaaq+1vv:SUPPRrajaaq # ;
++rajaaq+1vv:SUPPRrajaaq VerbContinuations ;
++raq+1vv:raq # ;
++raq+1vv:raq VerbContinuations ;
++raq+1vv:SUPPRraq # ;
++raq+1vv:SUPPRraq VerbContinuations ;
++rataaq+1vv:rataaq # ;
++rataaq+1vv:rataaq VerbContinuations ;
++rataaq+1vv:SUPPRrataaq # ;
++rataaq+1vv:SUPPRrataaq VerbContinuations ;
++rngaq+1vv:rngaq # ;
++rngaq+1vv:rngaq VerbContinuations ;
++rngaq+1vv:SUPPRrngaq # ;
++rngaq+1vv:SUPPRrngaq VerbContinuations ;
++rujuk+1vv:rujuk # ;
++rujuk+1vv:rujuk VerbContinuations ;
++rujuk+1vv:SUPPRrujuk # ;
++rujuk+1vv:SUPPRrujuk VerbContinuations ;
++rulu+2vv:rulu # ;
++rulu+2vv:rulu VerbContinuations ;
++rulu+2vv:SUPPRrulu # ;
++rulu+2vv:SUPPRrulu VerbContinuations ;
++saali+1vv:saali # ;
++saali+1vv:saali VerbContinuations ;
++saaq+1vv:saaq # ;
++saaq+1vv:saaq VerbContinuations ;
++saaq+1vv:SUPPRsaaq # ;
++saaq+1vv:SUPPRsaaq VerbContinuations ;
++saq+1vv:saq # ;
++saq+1vv:saq VerbContinuations ;
++saq+1vv:saq AfterApIRoot ;
++saq+1vv:SUPPRsaq # ;
++saq+1vv:SUPPRsaq VerbContinuations ;
++saq+1vv:SUPPRsaq AfterApIRoot ;
++sarait+1vv:sarait # ;
++sarait+1vv:sarait VerbContinuations ;
++sarait+1vv:SUPPRsarait # ;
++sarait+1vv:SUPPRsarait VerbContinuations ;
++saritu+1vv:saritu # ;
++saritu+1vv:saritu VerbContinuations ;
++saritu+1vv:SUPPRsaritu # ;
++saritu+1vv:SUPPRsaritu VerbContinuations ;
++si+2vv:si # ;
++si+2vv:si VerbContinuations ;
++si+2vv:SUPPRsi # ;
++si+2vv:SUPPRsi VerbContinuations ;
++sima+1vv:sima # ;
++sima+1vv:sima VerbContinuations ;
++sima+1vv:SUPPRsima # ;
++sima+1vv:SUPPRsima VerbContinuations ;
++siq+1vv:siq # ;
++siq+1vv:siq VerbContinuations ;
++siq+1vv:siq AfterApIRoot ;
++suq+1vv:suq # ;
++suq+1vv:suq VerbContinuations ;
++suq+1vv:suq AfterApIRoot ;
++suq+1vv:SUPPRsuq # ;
++suq+1vv:SUPPRsuq VerbContinuations ;
++suq+1vv:SUPPRsuq AfterApIRoot ;
++suujaq+1vv:suujaq # ;
++suujaq+1vv:suujaq VerbContinuations ;
++suujaq+1vv:SUPPRsuujaq # ;
++suujaq+1vv:SUPPRsuujaq VerbContinuations ;
++tainnaq+1vv:tainnaq # ;
++tainnaq+1vv:tainnaq VerbContinuations ;
++tainnaq+1vv:KGUARDtainnaq # ;
++tainnaq+1vv:KGUARDtainnaq VerbContinuations ;
++tainnaq+1vv:SUPPRtainnaq # ;
++tainnaq+1vv:SUPPRtainnaq VerbContinuations ;
++taq+1vv:taq # ;
++taq+1vv:taq VerbContinuations ;
++taq+1vv:taq AfterApSiRoot ;
++taq+1vv:taq AfterApRiRoot ;
++taq+1vv:KGUARDtaq # ;
++taq+1vv:KGUARDtaq VerbContinuations ;
++taq+1vv:KGUARDtaq AfterApSiRoot ;
++taq+1vv:KGUARDtaq AfterApRiRoot ;
++tigi+1vv:tigi # ;
++tigi+1vv:tigi VerbContinuations ;
++tigi+1vv:KGUARDtigi # ;
++tigi+1vv:KGUARDtigi VerbContinuations ;
++tit+1vv:tit # ;
++tit+1vv:tit VerbContinuations ;
++tit+1vv:tit AfterApSiRoot ;
++tit+1vv:KGUARDtit # ;
++tit+1vv:KGUARDtit VerbContinuations ;
++tit+1vv:KGUARDtit AfterApSiRoot ;
++tit+1vv:SUPPRtit # ;
++tit+1vv:SUPPRtit VerbContinuations ;
++tit+1vv:SUPPRtit AfterApSiRoot ;
++tsaliq+1vv:tsaliq # ;
++tsaliq+1vv:tsaliq VerbContinuations ;
++tsaliq+1vv:KGUARDtsaliq # ;
++tsaliq+1vv:KGUARDtsaliq VerbContinuations ;
++tsaliq+1vv:SUPPRtsaliq # ;
++tsaliq+1vv:SUPPRtsaliq VerbContinuations ;
++tsiaq+1vv:tsiaq # ;
++tsiaq+1vv:tsiaq VerbContinuations ;
++tsiaq+1vv:KGUARDtsiaq # ;
++tsiaq+1vv:KGUARDtsiaq VerbContinuations ;
++tsiaq+1vv:SUPPRtsiaq # ;
++tsiaq+1vv:SUPPRtsiaq VerbContinuations ;
++tsiriaq+1vv:tsiriaq # ;
++tsiriaq+1vv:tsiriaq VerbContinuations ;
++tsiriaq+1vv:KGUARDtsiriaq # ;
++tsiriaq+1vv:KGUARDtsiriaq VerbContinuations ;
++tsiriaq+1vv:SUPPRtsiriaq # ;
++tsiriaq+1vv:SUPPRtsiriaq VerbContinuations ;
++ttaili+1vv:ttaili # ;
